Utah statutes.
76-8-316.   Influencing, impeding, or retaliating against a judge or member
of the Board of Pardons and Parole.
(1)  A person is guilty of a third degree felony if the person threatens to
assault, kidnap, or murder a judge or a member of the Board of Pardons and
Parole with the intent to impede, intimidate, or interfere with the judge or
member of the board while engaged in the performance of the judge's or
member's official duties or with the intent to retaliate against the judge or
member on account of the performance of those official duties.
(2)  A person is guilty of a second degree felony if the person commits an
assault on a judge or a member of the Board of Pardons and Parole with the
intent to impede, intimidate, or interfere with the judge or member of the
board while engaged in the performance of the judge's or member's official
duties, or with the intent to retaliate against the judge or member on account
of the performance of those official duties.
(3)  A person is guilty of a first degree felony if the person commits
aggravated assault or attempted murder on a judge or a member of the Board of
Pardons and Parole with the purpose to impede, intimidate, or interfere with
the judge or member of the board while engaged in the performance of the
judge's or member's official duties or with the purpose to retaliate against
the judge or member on account of the performance of those official duties.
(4)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Immediate family" means parents, spouse, surviving spouse, children, and
siblings of the officer.
(b)  "Judge" means judges of all courts of record and courts not of record and
court commissioners.
(c)  "Judge or member" includes the members of the judge's or member's
immediate family.
(d)  "Member of the Board of Pardons and Parole" means appointed members of
the board.
(5)  A member of the Board of Pardons and Parole is an executive officer for
purposes of Subsection 76-5-202(1)(m).
